Utah statutes.
48-1-9.   Partnership charged with knowledge of or notice to partner.

Notice to any partner of any matter relating to partnership affairs, and the knowledge of the partner acting in the particular matter, acquired while a partner or then present to his mind, and the knowledge of any other partner who reasonably could and should have communicated it to the acting partner, operates as notice to or knowledge of the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.



No Change Since 1953 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

